Contents/Resources/Wolfram Player.app/Contents/SystemFiles/Components/SpellingData/SpellingDictionaries/de_DE.aff
FLAG num
SFX 912 Y 1
SFX 912 0 marke .
SFX 258 Y 1
SFX 258 0 markt .
SFX 2342 Y 1
SFX 2342 0 snummern .
SFX 932 Y 1
SFX 932 0 eigenschaften .
SFX 2035 Y 1
SFX 2035 0 sgeschäften .
SFX 1632 Y 1
SFX 1632 0 sgeschäftes .
SFX 3742 Y 1
SFX 3742 0 fragment .
SFX 4633 Y 1
SFX 4633 0 kongressen .
SFX 953 Y 1
SFX 953 0 lehren .
SFX 3275 Y 1
SFX 3275 0 lehrer .
SFX 780 Y 1
SFX 780 0 ebene .
SFX 4210 Y 1
SFX 4210 0 bohrer .
SFX 2202 Y 1
SFX 2202 0 sansätzen .
SFX 1979 Y 1
SFX 1979 0 waffen .
SFX 4965 Y 1
SFX 4965 0 sbescheiden .
SFX 2735 Y 1
SFX 2735 0 aufzeichnungen .
SFX 890 Y 1
SFX 890 0 zentren .
SFX 1228 Y 1
SFX 1228 0 entzündungen .
SFX 3008 Y 1
SFX 3008 0 bescheinigung .
SFX 1998 Y 1
SFX 1998 0 reste .
SFX 2148 Y 1
SFX 2148 0 stufen .
SFX 2239 Y 1
SFX 2239 0 stheorien .
SFX 4106 Y 1
SFX 4106 0 egeln .
SFX 4070 Y 1
SFX 4070 0 rekorde .
SFX 3899 Y 1
SFX 3899 0 symbolen .
SFX 4119 Y 1
SFX 4119 0 aufruf .
SFX 4199 Y 1
SFX 4199 0 entfernung .
SFX 128 Y 1
SFX 128 0 bahn .
SFX 3859 Y 1
SFX 3859 0 fabrikanten .
SFX 65 Y 1
SFX 65 0 bereichen .
SFX 78 Y 1
SFX 78 0 bereiches .
SFX 836 Y 1
SFX 836 0 ist .
SFX 1086 Y 1
SFX 1086 0 splätze .
SFX 696 Y 1
SFX 696 0 planes .
SFX 1945 Y 1
SFX 1945 0 skarte .
SFX 1384 Y 1
SFX 1384 0 ntwicklung .
SFX 2252 Y 1
SFX 2252 0 partei .
SFX 4919 Y 1
SFX 4919 0 tamm .
SFX 3851 Y 1
SFX 3851 0 geschoss .
SFX 4659 Y 1
SFX 4659 0 feldzug .
SFX 731 Y 1
SFX 731 0 werte .
SFX 4979 Y 1
SFX 4979 0 portlern .
SFX 1113 Y 1
SFX 1113 0 farbe .
SFX 4234 Y 1
SFX 4234 0 übertragung .
SFX 294 Y 1
SFX 294 0 seite .
SFX 2926 Y 1
SFX 2926 0 chauen .
SFX 1816 Y 1
SFX 1816 0 pflanzen .
SFX 3901 Y 1
SFX 3901 0 svorschlägen .
SFX 264 Y 1
SFX 264 0 ierungen .
SFX 2633 Y 1
SFX 2633 0 nfeldern .
SFX 4514 Y 1
SFX 4514 0 bunker .
SFX 423 Y 1
SFX 423 0 bericht .
SFX 3253 Y 1
SFX 3253 0 sanforderung .
SFX 2190 Y 1
SFX 2190 0 sverhältnis .
SFX 3904 Y 1
SFX 3904 0 svermögen .
SFX 2248 Y 1
SFX 2248 0 santrages .
SFX 2973 Y 1
SFX 2973 0 produzenten .
SFX 3520 Y 1
SFX 3520 0 fassaden .
SFX 2155 Y 1
SFX 2155 0 skontrolle .
SFX 2966 Y 1
SFX 2966 0 sfahrzeugen .
SFX 4846 Y 1
SFX 4846 0 etzung .
SFX 3912 Y 1
SFX 3912 0 sreaktionen .
SFX 1490 Y 1
SFX 1490 0 sauftrag .
SFX 4895 Y 1
SFX 4895 0 vergiftungen .
SFX 3232 Y 1
SFX 3232 0 sweise .
SFX 161 Y 1
SFX 161 0 häusern .
SFX 958 Y 1
SFX 958 0 vertrages .
SFX 2972 Y 1
SFX 2972 0 qualitäten .
SFX 3506 Y 1
SFX 3506 0 kategorie .
SFX 2556 Y 1
SFX 2556 0 route .
SFX 424 Y 1
SFX 424 0 unternehmens .
SFX 3009 Y 1
SFX 3009 0 bekämpfung .
SFX 1573 Y 1
SFX 1573 0 chnitten .
SFX 2472 Y 1
SFX 2472 0 ival .
SFX 4796 Y 1
SFX 4796 0 nlagers .
SFX 2525 Y 1
SFX 2525 0 länder .
SFX 2008 Y 1
SFX 2008 0 instrument .
SFX 2363 Y 1
SFX 2363 0 ersatzes .
SFX 3325 Y 1
SFX 3325 0 adern .
SFX 561 Y 1
SFX 561 0 änderungen .
SFX 1992 Y 1
SFX 1992 0 sebenen .
SFX 212 Y 1
SFX 212 0 satz .
SFX 2322 Y 1
SFX 2322 0 bock .
SFX 2984 Y 1
SFX 2984 0 kabel .
SFX 610 Y 1
SFX 610 0 elementen .
SFX 454 Y 1
SFX 454 0 räume .
SFX 2961 Y 1
SFX 2961 0 ssignale .
SFX 3038 Y 1
SFX 3038 0 ssignals .
SFX 1395 Y 1
SFX 1395 0 endung .
SFX 3659 Y 1
SFX 3659 0 alate .
SFX 3543 Y 1
SFX 3543 0 alats .
SFX 2133 Y 1
SFX 2133 0 blechen .
SFX 1753 Y 1
SFX 1753 0 maßnahme .
SFX 3375 Y 1
SFX 3375 0 reaktion .
SFX 766 Y 1
SFX 766 0 konzepten .
SFX 2571 Y 1
SFX 2571 0 konzeptes .
SFX 2549 Y 1
SFX 2549 0 swerk .
SFX 1241 Y 1
SFX 1241 0 swert .
SFX 2709 Y 1
SFX 2709 0 missionen .
SFX 4597 Y 1
SFX 4597 0 sbriefen .
SFX 987 Y 1
SFX 987 0 drucken .
SFX 2723 Y 1
SFX 2723 0 drucker .
SFX 448 Y 1
SFX 448 0 block .
SFX 527 Y 1
SFX 527 0 chiff .
SFX 4883 Y 1
SFX 4883 0 acker .
SFX 3434 Y 1
SFX 3434 0 ackes .
SFX 2825 Y 1
SFX 2825 0 sanzeigen .
SFX 405 Y 1
SFX 405 0 smitteln .
SFX 442 Y 1
SFX 442 0 smittels .
SFX 1314 Y 1
SFX 1314 0 frauen .
SFX 1973 Y 1
SFX 1973 0 bomben .
SFX 957 Y 1
SFX 957 0 besitzer .
SFX 2587 Y 1
SFX 2587 0 besitzes .
SFX 2417 Y 1
SFX 2417 0 dokumente .
SFX 1743 Y 1
SFX 1743 0 styp .
SFX 4056 Y 1
SFX 4056 0 sexpertin .
SFX 568 Y 1
SFX 568 0 handel .
SFX 2740 Y 1
SFX 2740 0 ade .
SFX 1090 Y 1
SFX 1090 0 rei .
SFX 33 Y 1
SFX 33 0 rem .
SFX 31 Y 1
SFX 31 0 ren .
SFX 34 Y 1
SFX 34 0 rer .
SFX 32 Y 1
SFX 32 0 res .
SFX 381 Y 1
SFX 381 0 kreisen .
SFX 474 Y 1
SFX 474 0 kreises .
SFX 1602 Y 1
SFX 1602 0 generation .
SFX 3576 Y 1
SFX 3576 0 sprotokollen .
SFX 3861 Y 1
SFX 3861 0 ektion .
SFX 453 Y 1
SFX 453 0 räumen .
SFX 350 Y 1
SFX 350 0 clubs .
SFX 1675 Y 1
SFX 1675 0 chaden .
SFX 4426 Y 1
SFX 4426 0 sgedanken .
SFX 4825 Y 1
SFX 4825 0 grundlagen .
SFX 2505 Y 1
SFX 2505 0 sverträge .
SFX 3660 Y 1
SFX 3660 0 alarmen .
SFX 2296 Y 1
SFX 2296 0 sterminen .
SFX 1305 Y 1
SFX 1305 0 sliste .
SFX 617 Y 1
SFX 617 0 blöcke .
SFX 4410 Y 1
SFX 4410 0 standard .
SFX 4501 Y 1
SFX 4501 0 federn .
SFX 2980 Y 1
SFX 2980 0 mantels .
SFX 3783 Y 1
SFX 3783 0 tik .
SFX 1327 Y 1
SFX 1327 0 til .
SFX 2149 Y 1
SFX 2149 0 stufe .
SFX 2371 Y 1
SFX 2371 0 beleuchtungen .
SFX 1829 Y 1
SFX 1829 0 chor .
SFX 2654 Y 1
SFX 2654 0 erfahrungen .
SFX 4756 Y 1
SFX 4756 0 sformulare .
SFX 5000 Y 1
SFX 5000 0 nestern .
SFX 2050 Y 1
SFX 2050 0 direktoren .
SFX 296 Y 1
SFX 296 0 industrie .
SFX 2789 Y 1
SFX 2789 0 bieren .
SFX 1454 Y 1
SFX 1454 0 designs .
SFX 2899 Y 1
SFX 2899 0 oftware .
SFX 2683 Y 1
SFX 2683 0 szustand .
SFX 2620 Y 1
SFX 2620 0 sbeginn .
SFX 1251 Y 1
SFX 1251 0 kurs .
SFX 2114 Y 1
SFX 2114 0 richtungen .
SFX 3824 Y 1
SFX 3824 0 ockeln .
SFX 3823 Y 1
SFX 3823 0 ockels .
SFX 4143 Y 1
SFX 4143 0 sreformen .
SFX 445 Y 1
SFX 445 0 eln .
SFX 2049 Y 1
SFX 2049 0 els .
SFX 605 Y 1
SFX 605 0 begriffen .
SFX 1879 Y 1
SFX 1879 0 autorin .
SFX 4940 Y 1
SFX 4940 0 sposition .
SFX 4352 Y 1
SFX 4352 0 cheren .
SFX 1972 Y 1
SFX 1972 0 chors .
SFX 2160 Y 1
SFX 2160 0 sakte .
SFX 586 Y 1
SFX 586 0 kultur .
SFX 2395 Y 1
SFX 2395 0 sapparate .
SFX 4813 Y 1
SFX 4813 0 kredite .
SFX 1484 Y 1
SFX 1484 0 svorgänge .
SFX 1765 Y 1
SFX 1765 0 beschlusses .
SFX 3542 Y 1
SFX 3542 0 anleihen .
SFX 2178 Y 1
SFX 2178 0 börse .
SFX 4367 Y 1
SFX 4367 0 zeichnungen .
SFX 4530 Y 1
SFX 4530 0 alzes .
SFX 4292 Y 1
SFX 4292 0 proben .
SFX 216 Y 1
SFX 216 0 traße .
SFX 2826 Y 1
SFX 2826 0 pektrums .
SFX 757 Y 1
SFX 757 0 fehler .
SFX 4840 Y 1
SFX 4840 0 ffekten .
SFX 2195 Y 1
SFX 2195 0 sektors .
SFX 2258 Y 1
SFX 2258 0 ndere .
SFX 3476 Y 1
SFX 3476 0 sblätter .
SFX 4139 Y 1
SFX 4139 0 svereinen .
SFX 4553 Y 1
SFX 4553 0 verkleidungen .
SFX 112 Y 1
SFX 112 0 ysteme .
SFX 111 Y 1
SFX 111 0 ystems .
SFX 2187 Y 1
SFX 2187 0 tür .
SFX 3817 Y 1
SFX 3817 0 produzent .
SFX 2947 Y 1
SFX 2947 0 turms .
SFX 1599 Y 1
SFX 1599 0 itz .
SFX 505 Y 1
SFX 505 0 zug .
SFX 1679 Y 1
SFX 1679 0 bindung .
SFX 4464 Y 1
SFX 4464 0 malerei .
SFX 991 Y 1
SFX 991 0 anzügen .
SFX 1442 Y 1
SFX 1442 0 schalter .
SFX 2504 Y 1
SFX 2504 0 svorschriften .
SFX 3929 Y 1
SFX 3929 0 schau .
SFX 1240 Y 1
SFX 1240 0 tand .
SFX 2878 Y 1
SFX 2878 0 tank .
SFX 2541 Y 1
SFX 2541 0 abrechnungen .
SFX 955 Y 1
SFX 955 0 ituation .
SFX 2727 Y 1
SFX 2727 0 chächten .
SFX 1133 Y 1
SFX 1133 0 trom .
SFX 1333 Y 1
SFX 1333 0 prinzip .
SFX 4803 Y 1
SFX 4803 0 nbergs .
SFX 3118 Y 1
SFX 3118 0 sziele .
SFX 3228 Y 1
SFX 3228 0 sziels .
SFX 4468 Y 1
SFX 4468 0 lndem .
SFX 4467 Y 1
SFX 4467 0 lnden .
SFX 4466 Y 1
SFX 4466 0 lnder .
SFX 4465 Y 1
SFX 4465 0 lndes .
SFX 316 Y 1
SFX 316 0 geschäft .
SFX 4442 Y 1
SFX 4442 0 protokoll .
SFX 4819 Y 1
SFX 4819 0 jacken .
SFX 3971 Y 1
SFX 3971 0 gipfel .
SFX 3745 Y 1
SFX 3745 0 faser .
SFX 4592 Y 1
SFX 4592 0 serfahrung .
SFX 660 Y 1
SFX 660 0 saufgaben .
SFX 3764 Y 1
SFX 3764 0 angst .
SFX 4585 Y 1
SFX 4585 0 skriterium .
SFX 4854 Y 1
SFX 4854 0 chwänze .
SFX 1647 Y 1
SFX 1647 0 ektor .
SFX 2462 Y 1
SFX 2462 0 messe .
SFX 2181 Y 1
SFX 2181 0 alltag .
SFX 1489 Y 1
SFX 1489 0 scheiben .
SFX 307 Y 1
SFX 307 0 bestand .
SFX 870 Y 1
SFX 870 0 ketten .
SFX 710 Y 1
SFX 710 0 sgerät .
SFX 4852 Y 1
SFX 4852 0 dienstleistungen .
SFX 3243 Y 1
SFX 3243 0 sprotokolle .
SFX 3468 Y 1
SFX 3468 0 sprotokolls .
SFX 133 Y 1
SFX 133 0 abteilungen .
SFX 467 Y 1
SFX 467 0 traßen .
SFX 4004 Y 1
SFX 4004 0 anfall .
SFX 4575 Y 1
SFX 4575 0 spostens .
SFX 1533 Y 1
SFX 1533 0 dstem .
SFX 1231 Y 1
SFX 1231 0 dsten .
SFX 1258 Y 1
SFX 1258 0 dster .
SFX 1293 Y 1
SFX 1293 0 dstes .
SFX 1268 Y 1
SFX 1268 0 zeichen .
SFX 3665 Y 1
SFX 3665 0 abteil .
SFX 1166 Y 1
SFX 1166 0 sgeschichte .
SFX 1612 Y 1
SFX 1612 0 chuhen .
SFX 2484 Y 1
SFX 2484 0 bewohner .
SFX 4608 Y 1
SFX 4608 0 rede .
SFX 1277 Y 1
SFX 1277 0 slisten .
SFX 1597 Y 1
SFX 1597 0 karriere .
SFX 3376 Y 1
SFX 3376 0 rassen .
SFX 4502 Y 1
SFX 4502 0 fang .
SFX 3296 Y 1
SFX 3296 0 fans .
SFX 1921 Y 1
SFX 1921 0 faktors .
SFX 2912 Y 1
SFX 2912 0 igem .
SFX 2313 Y 1
SFX 2313 0 igen .
SFX 2646 Y 1
SFX 2646 0 iger .
SFX 2911 Y 1
SFX 2911 0 iges .
SFX 1958 Y 1
SFX 1958 0 material .
SFX 4666 Y 1
SFX 4666 0 ernte .
SFX 4045 Y 1
SFX 4045 0 sregelungen .
SFX 4308 Y 1
SFX 4308 0 nanalyse .
SFX 3676 Y 1
SFX 3676 0 treik .
SFX 3779 Y 1
SFX 3779 0 treit .
SFX 2216 Y 1
SFX 2216 0 gewinnung .
SFX 787 Y 1
SFX 787 0 igungen .
SFX 4490 Y 1
SFX 4490 0 hündin .
SFX 758 Y 1
SFX 758 0 bedingung .
SFX 3432 Y 1
SFX 3432 0 ände .
SFX 4373 Y 1
SFX 4373 0 werkzeug .
SFX 3491 Y 1
SFX 3491 0 nhäuser .
SFX 1373 Y 1
SFX 1373 0 anspruch .
SFX 2685 Y 1
SFX 2685 0 svorschrift .
SFX 2188 Y 1
SFX 2188 0 teuern .
SFX 3204 Y 1
SFX 3204 0 ankers .
SFX 2975 Y 1
SFX 2975 0 pflanze .
SFX 2823 Y 1
SFX 2823 0 service .
SFX 2265 Y 1
SFX 2265 0 kapellen .
SFX 1999 Y 1
SFX 1999 0 rennens .
SFX 4339 Y 1
SFX 4339 0 führerin .
SFX 917 Y 1
SFX 917 0 ansatz .
SFX 4719 Y 1
SFX 4719 0 überwachungen .
SFX 225 Y 1
SFX 225 0 ierung .
SFX 3812 Y 1
SFX 3812 0 sbeitrags .
SFX 511 Y 1
SFX 511 0 bedingungen .
SFX 3265 Y 1
SFX 3265 0 nbildungen .
SFX 1183 Y 1
SFX 1183 0 festivals .
SFX 159 Y 1
SFX 159 0 ie .
SFX 525 Y 1
SFX 525 0 ik .
SFX 12 Y 1
SFX 12 0 in .
SFX 4327 Y 1
SFX 4327 0 is .
SFX 2075 Y 1
SFX 2075 0 orden .
SFX 840 Y 1
SFX 840 0 tätten .
SFX 4714 Y 1
SFX 4714 0 vögeln .
SFX 1481 Y 1
SFX 1481 0 versorgungen .
SFX 3977 Y 1
SFX 3977 0 erhebung .
SFX 1140 Y 1
SFX 1140 0 quelle .
SFX 3075 Y 1
SFX 3075 0 kontakte .
SFX 1101 Y 1
SFX 1101 0 zonen .
SFX 1364 Y 1
SFX 1364 0 mitglieder .
SFX 2080 Y 1
SFX 2080 0 mitgliedes .
SFX 3460 Y 1
SFX 3460 0 stroms .
SFX 4678 Y 1
SFX 4678 0 buchstaben .
SFX 1759 Y 1
SFX 1759 0 fällen .
SFX 4221 Y 1
SFX 4221 0 abwicklungen .
SFX 3249 Y 1
SFX 3249 0 sieg .
SFX 1583 Y 1
SFX 1583 0 ablaufes .
SFX 620 Y 1
SFX 620 0 vertrag .
SFX 2653 Y 1
SFX 2653 0 etze .
SFX 3796 Y 1
SFX 3796 0 sregelung .
SFX 2011 Y 1
SFX 2011 0 generationen .
SFX 337 Y 1
SFX 337 0 karten .
SFX 1379 Y 1
SFX 1379 0 sfläche .
SFX 1338 Y 1
SFX 1338 0 institute .
SFX 1563 Y 1
SFX 1563 0 instituts .
SFX 3147 Y 1
SFX 3147 0 nbetrieb .
SFX 2603 Y 1
SFX 2603 0 verarbeitung .
SFX 3492 Y 1
SFX 3492 0 nfolge .
SFX 1057 Y 1
SFX 1057 0 folgen .
SFX 4448 Y 1
SFX 4448 0 nträger .
SFX 847 Y 1
SFX 847 0 firma .
SFX 2179 Y 1
SFX 2179 0 autors .
SFX 2708 Y 1
SFX 2708 0 nahme .
SFX 4550 Y 1
SFX 4550 0 vorräten .
SFX 3269 Y 1
SFX 3269 0 mechanismus .
SFX 3631 Y 1
SFX 3631 0 eingangs .
SFX 1431 Y 1
SFX 1431 0 tätte .
SFX 1087 Y 1
SFX 1087 0 sleitern .
SFX 1306 Y 1
SFX 1306 0 sleiters .
SFX 1822 Y 1
SFX 1822 0 kanälen .
SFX 539 Y 1
SFX 539 0 ium .
SFX 4758 Y 1
SFX 4758 0 sflug .
SFX 3011 Y 1
SFX 3011 0 äure .
SFX 3361 Y 1
SFX 3361 0 snachweisen .
SFX 3123 Y 1
SFX 3123 0 snachweises .
SFX 676 Y 1
SFX 676 0 smethode .
SFX 493 Y 1
SFX 493 0 trägern .
SFX 492 Y 1
SFX 492 0 trägers .
SFX 4762 Y 1
SFX 4762 0 schlägen .
SFX 3068 Y 1
SFX 3068 0 lokomotive .
SFX 4044 Y 1
SFX 4044 0 sschreiben .
SFX 3934 Y 1
SFX 3934 0 sausgaben .
SFX 2000 Y 1
SFX 2000 0 rahmen .
SFX 2611 Y 1
SFX 2611 0 smuster .
SFX 3049 Y 1
SFX 3049 0 skreis .
SFX 1264 Y 1
SFX 1264 0 ätzen .
SFX 3842 Y 1
SFX 3842 0 liedern .
SFX 4797 Y 1
SFX 4797 0 nkunde .
SFX 239 Y 1
SFX 239 0 programmen .
SFX 640 Y 1
SFX 640 0 ausstellung .
SFX 1904 Y 1
SFX 1904 0 saktionen .
SFX 2390 Y 1
SFX 2390 0 sicherung .
SFX 4656 Y 1
SFX 4656 0 freundin .
SFX 730 Y 1
SFX 730 0 zene .
